Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB89.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3020. Compensation to volunteer fire companies for equipment or infrastructure failures.(a) Compensation.--If a local exchange telecommunications company's equipment or infrastructure failure results in the active deployment of a volunteer firefighter to the site of the failure, the company shall physically respond to the site of the failure within 90 minutes of receipt of notice of the failure. A local exchange telecommunications company that fails to physically respond within 90 minutes as required under this 123456789101112131415161718 subsection shall pay compensation to the volunteer fire company at a rate of $1,000 for each hour of active deployment of a volunteer firefighter.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Volunteer fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions)."Volunteer firefighter." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7412 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0089PN0072 - 2 - 1234567891011